Utah statutes.
17B-2a-210.   District required to minimize damage when entering on land --
Penalty for preventing or prohibiting a district from entering on land.
(1)  When entering upon land for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, or
repairing works, a drainage district may not do more damage than the necessity
of the occasion requires.
(2) (a)  A person who willfully prevents or prohibits an agent of a drainage
district from entering upon land when the district is authorized to enter the
land is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
(b) (i)  Each person found guilty under Subsection (2)(a) shall be fined a sum
not to exceed $25 per day for each day the person prevented or prohibited the
district from entering upon land.
(ii)  Each fine under Subsection (2)(b)(i) shall be paid to the district.
